Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-215
Election commissioner; rules and regulations; select registration and polling places.

(1) The election commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations in regard to elections and the registration of voters in his or her county which are not inconsistent with the Election Act or the rules and regulations of the Secretary of State. The election commissioner shall have charge of and make provisions for all elections to be held in such county unless otherwise specifically provided.

(2) The election commissioner shall select and appoint the places of registration and the polling place for each precinct and cause the same to be properly equipped and maintained.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 35;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 18.